Hawaii statutes.
§323F-10 Regional public health facility
management advisory committees. (a) On the transfer date, there shall be
established within the corporation for each region, a public health facility
management advisory committee to consist of nine members initially to be
appointed by the chief executive officer of the corporation with the advice of
the hospital administrators of the facilities in the affected regions. The
members shall serve for a term of four years; provided that upon the initial
appointment of the members, two shall be appointed for a term of one year, two
for a term of two years, two for a term of three years, and three for a term of
four years.

Following the initial appointments by the chief
executive officer of the corporation board, any vacancies on a regional
committee shall be filled by a simple majority vote of the members of the
executive committee from a list of qualified nominees submitted by the regional
committee in which the vacancy occurred. If a regional committee vacancy remains
unfilled for more than thirty days, that vacancy may be filled by the chief
executive officer of the corporation.

Each regional management advisory committee
shall include medical and health care providers, consumers, and knowledgeable
individuals in other appropriate areas such as business and law; provided that
at least one member shall be a physician with active medical staff privileges
at one of the region's public health facilities. At least three members of the
committee shall be consumers.

The management advisory committee for the East
Hawaii region shall have three members who reside in the Ka‘u district, three
members who reside in the Hamakua/North Hilo districts, and three members who
reside in the South Hilo/Puna districts. The management advisory committee for
the West Hawaii region shall have not less than three members who reside in the
North Kohala/South Kohala districts.

Each regional committee shall select its own
chairperson and vice chairperson and shall adopt rules governing the terms for
removal of its chairperson from the executive management advisory committee.
In the event of a regional committee voting to remove its chairperson who
concurrently sits on the corporation board, that vote shall be unanimous. In
the event of a regional committee voting to remove its physician member from
the corporation board, that vote shall also be unanimous. Each regional
committee may also adopt other rules as it may consider necessary for the
conduct of its business.

The members of the regional committees shall
serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for traveling expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties. The corporation shall provide for
the necessary expenses of the committees; provided that no expenses may be incurred
without prior authorization by the chief executive officer.

(b) Each regional committee shall sit in an
advisory capacity to the chief executive officer on matters concerning the
formulation of regional operational and capital improvement budgets, and the
planning, construction, improvement, maintenance, and operation of public
health facilities within its respective jurisdiction and shall sit in an
advisory capacity to the governor on matters concerning the nominees for
positions on the corporation board. Nothing in this section shall be construed
as precluding or preventing the committees from coordinating their efforts and
activities with the facility administrators within their counties.

(c) Each regional committee may prepare a
report for inclusion with the corporation's annual report and audit, which
shall include but not be limited to comments and analyses on the corporation's
regional operational and capital improvement budgets for its respective region.

(d) Upon the establishment of a regional
system board for a regional system pursuant to section 323F-3.5, this section
shall no longer apply to that regional system. [L 1996, c 262, pt of §2; am L
1998, c 229, §8; am L 2007, c 290, §26]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next